Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2,123.01
Probation officers; appointment prohibited.

Separate juvenile courts shall be prohibited from appointing juvenile probation officers after December 31, 1984.

Laws 1984, LB 13, § 67.

Definitions applicable, see section 29-2246.